Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 42 Finance and Administration Cabinet

42.001.
Definition of writing.

As used in this chapter, “writing” or “written” means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 120, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

42.005.
Definitions for KRS 42.010.

As used in KRS

42.010

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Department” means a basic unit of administrative organization of the Finance and Administration Cabinet designated by statute or by statutorily authorized executive action as a “department.” A department may contain offices, divisions, or both, that report to it;

“Office” means a basic unit of administrative organization of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. An office may or may not report directly to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. An office may contain offices, divisions, or both, that report to it;

“Division” means a major branch of a department or office established by statute or by statutorily authorized administrative action;

“Administrative body” includes authority, board, bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, and any other form or organization in the executive branch of government, but does not include “office,” “department,” “program cabinet” or “division”;

“Program cabinet” means a group of departments, or departments and commissions, or departments and offices, or other administrative bodies, designated by statute or statutorily authorized executive action as a “program cabinet.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 447, § 8, effective January 1, 1984; 2005, ch. 85, § 48, effective June 20, 2005.

42.010.
Definition of state agency.

As used in KRS

42.0171

,

42.0172

, and

42.425

, unless the context requires otherwise, “state agency” means any state administrative body, department or division as defined by KRS

42.005

.

History.

4618-69: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 210, § 5; 1966, ch. 255, § 48; 1980, ch. 188, § 15, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 447, § 9, effective January 1, 1984; 1984, ch. 111, § 32, effective July 13, 1984; 2005, ch. 85, § 49, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The provisions of this chapter are not applicable to local boards of education.

OAG 61-894

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative organization, KRS Ch. 12.

Annual audit by Auditor, KRS

43.050

.

Vocational education and rehabilitation, KRS Ch. 163.

42.011.
Finance and Administration Cabinet created — Office of secretary. [Repealed.]

42.012.
Secretary as state’s chief financial officer.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be the chief financial officer of the state and the adviser of the Governor and the General Assembly in financial matters, and shall at all times protect the financial interests of the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 2; 1978, ch. 155, § 42, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 393, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 13, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

42.013.
Deputy secretary — Organization of office. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.014.
Organization of cabinet.

There is established within the cabinet the:

Office of the Secretary;

Commonwealth Office of Technology, and the Office of the Controller, each of which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor; and

Department of Revenue and the Department for Facilities and Support Services, each of which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the secretary, upon the approval of the Governor, and responsible to the secretary. Each of these departments may have at least one (1) major assistant not in the classified service.

The secretary shall establish the internal organization and assignment of functions which are not established by statute, and shall divide the cabinet into the offices, bureaus, divisions, or other units the secretary deems necessary to perform the functions, powers, and duties of the cabinet, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 12.

All appointments under this chapter to positions not in the classified service shall be made pursuant to KRS

12.050

, and such appointees shall be major assistants to the secretary and shall assist in the development of policy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 4; 1976, ch. 299, § 7; 1978, ch. 155, § 44, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 183, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 393, § 19, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 186, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 340, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 273, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 321, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 378, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 216, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 508, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 68, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 83, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 46, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 506, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 12, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 10, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). This section was amended by 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 85 and 95, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

42.0141.
Establishment of Office of Revenue Estimating and Economic Analysis. [Repealed.]

42.0145.
Office of the Secretary.

The Office of the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall consist of the Office of Inspector General, Office of General Counsel, Office of Administrative Services, Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs, Office of Policy and Audit, Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance, and Office of Fleet Management, each headed by an executive director who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor. The Office of the Secretary shall include a deputy secretary who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor. The deputy secretary shall be responsible to and have such authority to sign for the secretary as the secretary designates in writing.

The secretary may organize the office into such additional administrative units as he deems necessary to perform the functions and fulfill the duties of the cabinet, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 12.

All appointments under this chapter to positions not in the classified service shall be made pursuant to KRS

12.050

, and such appointees shall be major assistants to the secretary and shall assist in the development of policy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 3; 1976, ch. 299, § 6; 1978, ch. 155, § 43, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 393, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 340, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 13, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 5, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 12, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 19, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 131, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 51, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

42.0146.
Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance — Oversight of certification program for disabled veteran-owned businesses — Administrative regulations.

For purposes of this section:

“Disabled veteran” means an individual, domiciled in Kentucky, who has served on active duty in the Armed Forces, has been separated therefrom under honorable or general conditions, and has established the present existence of a service-connected disability or is receiving compensation, disability retirements benefits, or pension because of a public statute administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or Department of Defense, or was terminated from active duty by the Department of Defense because of a disability; and

“Disabled veteran-owned business” means a business:

Where a disabled veteran has at least fifty-one percent (51%) ownership;

That is independently owned and operated;

That does not exceed the applicable size standards for its industry, as determined by the United States Small Business Administration;

That has been owned and operated by the disabled veteran for at least a full calendar or fiscal year; and

For which the disabled veteran has filed a business tax return consisting of a full calendar or fiscal year.

The Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance shall oversee a program that provides certification of a disabled veteran-owned business in order to encourage growth among businesses owned by disabled veterans within the state and assist those businesses in competing for work in other states that require certification by a statewide body. This certification does not provide a preference in state procurement, nor does it create a point system or set aside for disabled veteran-owned businesses.

In order to apply for certification, a disabled veteran shall provide proof of his or her disability. Proof shall be in the form of Department of Defense Form DD 214, United States Department of Veterans Affairs disability letter, or other United States Department of Veterans Affairs documentation establishing a service-connected disability.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate any administrative regulations necessary to create and manage the disabled veteran-owned business certification program, which may include but is not limited to additional certification requirements, the application process, onsite visitation by the Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance, and recertification.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

42.0147.
Office of the Inspector General.

The Office of the Inspector General is established within the Office of the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and shall be responsible for conducting various investigations within the executive branch in accordance with KRS

45.131

.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 131, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 81, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

42.0148.
Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.

The Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs is established within the Finance and Administration Cabinet to provide executive direction and coordination of the cabinet’s legislative priorities.

The Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs, in close communication with the secretary, shall:

Proactively pursue the goals of the cabinet by working with members of the General Assembly and the staff of the Legislative Research Commission;

Oversee all public information issues;

Manage requests for information; and

Prepare press releases, respond to press inquiries, and coordinate the publication of newsletters, reports, Web site information, and other statewide communications of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 131, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

42.015.
Transfer of functions, powers and duties to department and secretary. [Repealed.]

42.016.
Corporate bodies and instrumentalities attached to Office of Secretary.

The following corporate bodies and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth shall be attached to the Office of the Secretary for administrative purposes and staff services:

State Property and Buildings Commission;

Kentucky Turnpike Authority;

State Investment Commission;

Kentucky Housing Corporation;

Kentucky River Authority; and

Executive Branch Ethics Commission.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 6; 1976, ch. 299, § 8; 1978, ch. 155, § 45, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 13, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 184, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 382, § 29, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 393, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 339, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 346, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 406, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 154, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 208, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 83, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 221, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 265, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 27, § 8, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 85, § 50, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 152, § 13, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 13, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 12, § 20, effective June 25, 2009; 2021 ch. 12, § 5, effective March 12, 2021.

42.017.
Office of General Counsel.

The Office of General Counsel established within the Office of the Secretary by KRS

42.0145

shall be responsible for the coordination and provision of legal services for the cabinet and for other functions and duties as the secretary may assign relating to the performance of the cabinet’s legal services.

The Office of General Counsel shall be headed by an executive director who shall function as the general counsel. The executive director shall be appointed in accordance with KRS

12.210

and shall report to the secretary. The Attorney General, on request of the secretary, may designate attorneys in the Office of General Counsel as assistant attorneys general as provided in KRS

15.105

.

The Office of General Counsel shall consist of two (2) offices, each of which shall provide legal services for its respective offices and departments, as follows:

Office of Legal Services for Finance and Technology, headed by an executive director and composed of organizational entities deemed appropriate by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet; and

Office of Legal Services for Revenue, headed by an executive director, including organizational entities deemed appropriate by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 340, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 12, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 21, effective June 25, 2009.

42.0171.
Office of Administrative Services.

The Office of Administrative Services established in KRS

42.0145

shall be generally responsible for all internal administrative and human resource functions of the cabinet, including but not limited to providing administrative assistance; managing and preparing the cabinet’s budget; performing general accounting; managing fiscal, personnel, and payroll functions of the cabinet; providing statewide postal and printing services; providing administrative support to boards and commissions; and performing any additional administrative functions and duties the secretary may assign.

There shall be established in the Office of Administrative Services:

The Office of Budget and Fiscal Management, headed by an executive director who shall report directly to the executive director of the Office of Administrative Services, and consisting of the:

Division of Budget; and

Division of Fiscal Management; and

The following divisions which shall be headed by a division director who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Administrative Services:

Division of Human Resources; and

Division of Postal Services.

Executive directors and division directors appointed under this section shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS

12.050

. There may be, if needed, sections assigned to specific areas of work, responsible directly to the executive director of the Office of Administrative Services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 49, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 393, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 214, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 216, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 508, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 5, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 22, effective June 25, 2009; 2021 ch. 81, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 51, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

42.0172.
Division of Postal Services.

The Division of Postal Services shall operate the centralized postal services for executive branch agencies as set forth in KRS

12.020

. The division shall operate at a central location with additional locations necessary to maintain and improve service levels.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 51, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 393, § 24, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 214, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 508, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 15, effective May 30, 1997; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 10, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 23, effective June 25, 2009.

42.0173.
Office of Public Information. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2017 ch. 131, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

42.0174.
Office of Policy and Audit.

The Office of Policy and Audit established within the Office of the Secretary by KRS

42.0145

shall have the duties and responsibilities established in KRS

42.065

.

The Office of Policy and Audit shall be headed by an executive director who shall be appointed in accordance with KRS

12.050

and shall report to the secretary.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 69, § 3, effective July 12, 2012.

42.0175.
Office of Fleet Management.

The Office of Fleet Management pursuant to KRS

42.0145

shall be generally responsible for all technical and administrative services related to the Commonwealth’s fleet of vehicles, including but not limited to:

Procuring vehicles;

Maintaining and repairing vehicles;

Reserving, assigning, and distributing vehicles;

Reporting fleet mileage; and

Performing any additional administrative functions and duties the secretary may assign.

There shall be established in the Office of Fleet Management the following divisions which shall be headed by a division director who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Fleet Management:

Division of Maintenance; and

Division of Operations and Administration.

The division directors appointed under this section shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS

12.050

. There may be, if needed, sections assigned to specific areas of work, responsible directly to the executive director of the Office of Fleet Management.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

42.018.
Office of Capital Plaza Operations. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 340, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 216, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 83, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 12, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 51, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2018 ch. 69, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

42.019.
Division of Historic Properties — State curator.

The Division of Historic Properties established by KRS

42.425

shall be responsible for overseeing the management and preservation of state-owned historic properties including, but not limited to, the Executive Mansion, Old Governor’s Mansion, Vest Lindsey House, Berry Hill, and the State Capitol. In addition, the division shall be responsible for maintaining state-owned furniture, china, silver, and art works and the care, display, inventory, conservation, restoration, and storage of any state-owned item of historical significance.

The Department of Parks and the Kentucky Horse Park may advise and consult the Division of Historic Properties in the operation, maintenance, restoration, conservation, and inventory of the state’s shrines and museums.

The director of the Division of Historic Properties shall serve as state curator pursuant to KRS

11.026

. The director may employ the personnel and assemble the records and files necessary to perform the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 340, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 176, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 85, §
699, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 13, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

42.0192.
Office of Risk Management. [Amended and Redesignated]. [Transferred]

42.020.
Organization of department — Commissioner of finance — Deputy Commissioner. [Repealed.]

42.0201.
Office of the Controller.

There is created within the Finance and Administration Cabinet the Office of the Controller.

The Office of the Controller shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet with the approval of the Governor. The executive director shall function as the state controller, who shall be a person qualified by education and experience for the position and held in high professional esteem in the accounting community.

The state controller shall be the Commonwealth’s chief accounting officer and shall be responsible for all aspects of accounting policies and procedures, financial accounting systems, and internal accounting control policies and procedures. The Office of the Controller shall establish guidelines for state personnel administration on issues relating to paycheck distribution dates, assignment of data elements to accurately report labor costs, assignment and tracking of actual expenditures by code, and coverage issues relating to Social Security and Medicare.

The state controller; the executive director of the Office of Financial Management, Finance and Administration Cabinet; and the state budget director designated under KRS

11.068

shall develop and maintain the Commonwealth’s strategic financial management program.

Executive directors and division directors appointed under this section shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor.

There are established in the Office of the Controller the following organizational entities:

The Office of Financial Management, which shall be headed by an executive director, shall have the duties and responsibilities established in KRS

42.410

, and shall serve as administrative staff to the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky. The executive director shall serve as secretary to the authority;

The Office of Material and Procurement Services, which shall be headed by an executive director and shall have the duties established in KRS

42.024

. There are established within the Office of Material and Procurement Services the following organizational entities:

The Division of Professional Services and Training, which shall be headed by a division director who is appointed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to KRS

12.050

, and who shall report to the executive director; and

The Division of Contract Management, which shall be headed by a division director who is appointed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to KRS

12.050

, and who shall report to the executive director;

The Division of Local Government Services, which shall be headed by a division director and shall be responsible for:

Providing property valuation administrators with fiscal, personnel, payroll, training, and other essential administrative support services;

Overseeing Kentucky’s Social Security coverage program, including but not limited to all aspects of FICA wage reporting for state government and the Commonwealth’s Social Security coverage agreement;

Serving as liaison between local governments and the federal Internal Revenue Service and Social Security Administration;

Serving as the payroll and fiscal officer for the sheriff and clerk in counties over seventy thousand (70,000) in population, disbursing various reimbursements and expenditures to local governments and serving as liaison and conduit for all court fees associated with report of state money through the Circuit Courts;

Directing the federal employment tax program for state employees; and

Performing state government’s duties relating to the county fee system for local entities;

The Office of Statewide Accounting Services, headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, subject to the approval of the Governor. The executive director shall report directly to the state controller. The office shall perform financial record keeping functions at the state controller’s direction, and shall be responsible for the performance of the cabinet’s functions outlined in KRS

45.305

,

48.800

, and other related statutes. There is established within the Office of Statewide Accounting Services the Division of Customer Resource Center, which shall be headed by a division director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 12.050 and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Statewide Accounting Services. The division shall be responsible for:

Providing a help desk for users of state government’s financial and procurement system, including state employee users and vendors and payees of the Commonwealth who do, or would like to do, business with the state;

Training state employees in the use of state government’s financial and procurement system; and

Assisting cabinet entities in improving the quality of their products and processes; and

The Division of State Risk and Insurance Services, headed by a division director appointed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, subject to the approval of the Governor. The director shall report directly to the state controller and shall have the duties specified in KRS

42.0651

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 508, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 5, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 46, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 11, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 24, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 69, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

42.021.
Governor’s advisory council to the office of volunteer services. [Amended and reenacted.]

42.022.
Functions and duties of deputy secretary for the office for policy and management. [Repealed.]

42.023.
Department for Administration — Duties — Organization. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.024.
Office of Material and Procurement Services.

The Office of Material and Procurement Services within the Office of the Controller shall be responsible for the performance of the cabinet’s purchasing functions under KRS Chapters 45 and 45A, except those purchasing functions related to the acquisition of interests in real property, and contractual and construction services which are related to and required in connection with the construction, renovation, and repair of state-owned buildings. The Office of Material and Procurement Services shall be responsible for the control of all state-purchased personal property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 50, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 393, § 23, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 33, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 386, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 216, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 508, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 5, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, §
12, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 216 and 508. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 508, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

42.0245.
Division of Risk Management. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.025.
Division of Printing and Division of Postal Services — Duties. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.026.
Bureau of computer services established — Organization — Duties. [Repealed.]

42.027.
Department for Facilities Management — Organization — Duties — Responsibilities. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.0271.
Plaque commemorating prisoners and missing soldiers in Vietnam War — Duties of Department of Veterans’ Affairs and Department of Facilities Management relating to plaque and Freedom Tree. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

42.028.
Bureau of public properties established — Organization — Duties. [Repealed.]

42.029.
Department of Information Systems — Commissioner and other personnel — Divisions — Duties — Delegation of authority. [Repealed.]

42.030.
General functions of department. [Repealed.]

42.032.
Web site to provide public access to expenditure records of executive branch — Monthly and weekly updates — Cabinet is sole custodian of information and records — Branches to share software and applications.

By January 1, 2012, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide public access to records relating to expenditures of the executive branch of state government through display of the records on a Web site. The Web site shall provide:

Financial information of expenditures not exempt under the provisions of state or federal law, including:

The payee name;

The category or type of the expenditure;

A description of the reason for the expenditure, if available;

The expenditure amount; and

A link to the financial document, if the document is electronically available;

A searchable format;

Access to the current enacted Executive Branch Budget; and

A link to the public access Web site displays of the legislative and judicial branches of state government, and of the public institutions of higher education.

Information on the Web site shall be updated at least on a monthly basis. However, information on the Web site which is part of, or contained in, an electronic accounting system utilized by all branches of state government, such as the Enhanced Management Administrative Reporting System (EMARS), shall be updated on a weekly basis.

The cabinet shall maintain exclusive control and be considered the sole custodian of all information and records generated by and through activity of the executive branch of government, notwithstanding the situs of the information and the records in another branch of government, and disclosure thereof shall only be by the cabinet in accordance with applicable law.

In order to reduce Web site development costs and enhance public access and use of records viewed through Web sites as provided by this section and KRS

7.505

and

26A.260

, each branch of state government shall freely share with the other branches of state government the software, software developments, and all applications, data, and information within its control used for Web site design, appearance, content, and operation in compliance with, or in furtherance of, the purposes contemplated by this section and KRS

7.505

and

26A.260

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 105, § 3, effective June 8, 2011.

42.035.
Executive Mansion — Maintenance and operation — Duties of cabinet as to food, personnel and Governor’s travel expenses.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be responsible for the management, maintenance, and operation, including the purchase for all purposes of all food and related supplies, of the Executive Mansion, and further including the reasonable and necessary expenses of the chief executive while traveling on business of the Commonwealth outside of the state. Such personnel, including domestic and household servants, as are necessary for the operation and maintenance of the Executive Mansion shall be employed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The provisions of KRS Chapter 42 shall apply to all purchases made for the maintenance and operation of the mansion. None of the provisions of KRS

18A.110

and

18A.155

shall apply to personnel employed for the maintenance and operation of the mansion.

A reasonable amount shall be deducted from the salary or other allowance of the Governor for the consumption by the Governor and his family of such food and supplies.

A reasonable amount shall be deducted from the salaries of personnel employed in operational and maintenance functions, including domestic and household servants, for the consumption by such personnel of such food and supplies.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain such records relative to the management, maintenance, and operation of the Governor’s Mansion and travel expenses of the chief executive as may be dictated by sound accounting practices.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 11, § 1; 1962, ch. 210, § 6; 1964, ch. 18, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1982, ch. 448, § 60, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

While there appears to be no problem in citizens voluntarily making a donation to see the governor’s mansion, the Finance and Administration Cabinet has no statutory authority to charge fees or ticket costs to the public for a tour of the Governor’s Mansion, either for a one-time situation or more; further, the cabinet has no authority to permit a nonprofit corporation organized to raise funds for the mansion renovation to sell tickets to the public for such a tour of the Governor’s Mansion.

OAG 83-120

.

42.037.
Old Governor’s Mansion, maintenance and operation — Duties of cabinet as to food, personnel.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be responsible for the management, maintenance, and operation, including the purchase for all purposes of all food and related supplies, of the Old Governor’s Mansion. Such personnel, including domestic and household servants, as are necessary for the operation and maintenance of the Old Governor’s Mansion shall be employed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all purchases made for the maintenance and operation of the Old Governor’s Mansion. None of the provisions of KRS

18A.110

and

18A.155

shall apply to the personnel employed for the maintenance and operation of the Old Governor’s Mansion.

A reasonable amount shall be deducted from the salary or other allowance of the Lieutenant Governor for the consumption by the Lieutenant Governor and his family of such food and supplies.

A reasonable amount shall be deducted from the salaries of personnel employed in operational and maintenance functions, including domestic and household servants, for the consumption by such personnel of such food and supplies.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain such records relative to the management, maintenance, and operation of the Lieutenant Governor’s mansion as may be dictated by sound accounting practices.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 94, § 1; 1964, ch. 18, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1982, ch. 448, § 61, effective July 15, 1982.

42.038.
Vest Lindsey House — Use as state meeting house and visitor information center.

The Division of Historic Properties shall establish the Vest Lindsey House as a state meeting house and restrict its use, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to small meetings, luncheons, receptions, and other similar functions deemed appropriate by the Historic Properties Advisory Commission.

The use of the Vest Lindsey House as a state meeting house, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, shall be available to state and local government agencies, nonprofit organizations, and private persons and entities, all subject to availability and with the approval of the director of the Division of Historic Properties or his or her designee.

In addition to the use of the Vest Lindsey House as a state meeting house, the Division of Historic Properties shall maintain the Vest Lindsey House as a central visitor information center for the North Frankfort area, and, in consultation with the Kentucky Heritage Council, shall develop and display interpretative materials and other resources regarding the historical and architectural significance of the Vest Lindsey House and other sites in the North Frankfort area.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 24, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

42.040.
Division of the budget. [Repealed.]

42.050.
Division of accounts. [Repealed.]

42.055.
Division of services. [Repealed.]

42.060.
Division of Purchases. [Repealed.]

42.061.
Division of purchases. [Repealed.]

42.062.
Definition for KRS 42.064 and 42.066. [Repealed.]

42.064.
Division of occupations and professions. [Repealed.]

42.065.
Powers of Office of Policy and Audit.

The Office of Policy and Audit established in the Office of the Secretary in KRS

42.0145

may, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, conduct any internal audit, investigation, or management review in the Finance and Administration Cabinet related to the secretary’s duties and responsibilities as chief financial officer of the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS

42.012

.

When it is necessary to complete an internal audit, investigation, or management review in the Finance and Administration Cabinet, with the written approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Office of Policy and Audit shall have access during business hours to all books, reports, papers, and accounts in the office or under the custody or control of any budget unit, or of any other program cabinet, department, or agency under the authority and direction of the Governor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 216, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 68, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 5, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, §
13, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 25, effective June 25, 2009.